test/src/morphology/V-wicih_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - wicih - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niwicihâw
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiwicihâw
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [wicihêw, wicihik, wicihkow]
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: [wicihêyiwa, wicihikoyiwa]

     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niwicihânân
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiwicihânaw
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiwicihâwâw
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [wicihêwak, wicihkow]
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3SgO: wicihêyiwa

     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niwicihâwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiwicihâwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [wicihêw, wicihikowak, wicihikak]
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3PlO: wicihêyiwa
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3oPlO: wicihikoyiwa

     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niwicihânânak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiwicihânawak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiwicihâwâwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wicihikowak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: wicihêwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3PlO: wicihêyiwa

     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niwicihik
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiwicihik
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niwicihikonân
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiwicihikonaw
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiwicihikowâw
     
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niwicihikwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiwicihikwak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niwicihikonânak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiwicihikonawak
     wicih+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiwicihikowâwak




     
     
     
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ê-wicihak
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ê-wicihakik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ê-wicihâyâhk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3PlO: ê-wicihâyâhkik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3SgO: ê-wicihâyâhk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3PlO: ê-wicihâyâhkok
     
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ê-wicihat
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ê-wicihacik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ê-wicihâyêk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3PlO: ê-wicihâyêkok

     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3oPlO: ê-wicihikocik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3SgO: ê-wicihâcik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3PlO: ê-wicihâcik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ê-wicihiskik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2PlO: ê-wicihikoyêkok
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ê-wicihicik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1PlO: ê-wicihikoyâhkik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+12PlO: ê-wicihikoyâhkok

     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3oPlO: ê-wicihikocik
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3SgO: ê-wicihât
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3PlO: ê-wicihât
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ê-wicihisk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ê-wicihikoyêk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ê-wicihit
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ê-wicihikoyâhk
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+12PlO: ê-wicihikoyahk

     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oSgO: ê-wicihkoyit
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oPlO: ê-wicihikoyit
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-wicihkot
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-wicihikot
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3PlO: ê-wicihikocik

     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oSgO: ê-wicihkoyit
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oPlO: ê-wicihikoyit
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-wicihkot
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-wicihikot
     wicih+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3PlO: ê-wicihikocik


     wicih+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3SgO: wicihaki
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3PlO: wicihakwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3SgO: wicihâyâhki
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3PlO: wicihâyâhkwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3SgO: wicihâyâhko
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3PlO: wicihâyâhkwâwi

     wicih+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3SgO: wicihaci
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3PlO: wicihatwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3SgO: wicihâyêko
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3PlO: wicihâyêkwâwi

     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3SgO: wicihâci
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3oSgO: wicihâyici
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3PlO: wicihikotwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1SgO: wicihici
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2SgO: wicihiski
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1PlO: wicihikoyâhki
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2PlO: wicihikoyêko
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+12PlO: wicihikoyahko

     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3SgO: wicihâtwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: wicihâtwâwi
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: wicihikotwâwi


     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3SgO: wicihikoci
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3PlO: wicihâyici
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3SgO: wicihikoci
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3PlO: wicihâyici
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3oPlO: wicihikoyici
     wicih+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3oPlO: wicihikoyici

     wicih+V+TA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: wicih
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: wicihihk
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+12Pl+3SgO: wicihâtân

     wicih+V+TA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: wicihik
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: wicihihkok
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+12Pl+3PlO: wicihâtânik

     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3SgO: wicihâhkan
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3SgO: wicihâhkêk
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3SgO: wicihâhkahk

     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Sg+3PlO: wicihâhkanik
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+2Pl+3PlO: wicihihkâhkêkok
     wicih+V+TA+Imp+Del+12Pl+3PlO: wicihâhkahkok
